Maryland, session 2025, SB0845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–103.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0845*

SENATE BILL 845
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NASDTEC” MEANS THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
OF STATE DIRECTORS OF TEACHER EDUCATION AND CERTIFICATION.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION” MEANS A
NATIONAL ORGANIZATION THAT IS A NATIONAL COLLECTION POINT FOR
PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINE ACTIONS TAKEN BY ALL 50 STATES, THE DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA, THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY
SCHOOLS, AND GUAM THAT PROVIDES MEMBERS WITH NOTIFICATION OF AN ACTION
TAKEN AGAINST THE CREDENTIAL OF AN EDUCATOR BY OTHER MEMBER STATES OR
JURISDICTIONS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) REGISTER EACH LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY IN THE STATE AS AN
ASSOCIATE MEMBER OF A NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES
ACCESS TO THE EDUCATOR IDENTIFICATION CLEARINGHOUSE; AND
(2) PAY ANY APPLICABLE FEES AND DUES ASSOCIATED WITH
MEMBERSHIP IN THE NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION.
(B) (C) EACH LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY IN THE STATE SHALL:
(1) BECOME AN ASSOCIATE MEMBER OF NASDTEC; AND
(2) UTILIZE UTILIZE NASDTEC’S THE EDUCATOR IDENTIFICATION
CLEARINGHOUSE THROUGH THE NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION TO
SCREEN:
(I) EACH EDUCATOR EMPLOYED WITHIN THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM AS OF JULY 1, 2025; AND
(II) EACH EACH INDIVIDUAL WHO APPLIES FOR AN EDUCATOR
POSITION WITHIN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.